Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Farm Bureaus

247.240.
County farm bureaus authorized.

A farm bureau may be incorporated in each county.

Farm bureaus may acquire, by gift or purchase, real and personal property and may exercise all powers necessary or convenient to successfully carry out the objects of farm bureaus.

Farm bureau corporations shall not declare dividends.

History.

42d-1, 42d-5, 42d-8.

247.250.
Articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation of a farm bureau shall be as follows:

“We, the undersigned farmers or landowners, residents of County, Kentucky, hereby adopt the following articles of incorporation: “Article 1.
The objects of this incorporation shall be to advance and improve in County, Kentucky, the science and art of agriculture, home economics, horticulture and animal industry, cooperating with the State Department of Agriculture, the College of Agriculture of the University of Kentucky and the United States Department of Agriculture. “Article 2.
The name of this corporation shall be the County Farm Bureau of County, Kentucky. “Article 3.
The affairs of this corporation shall be conducted by a president, a vice president, a secretary and a treasurer, who shall perform the duties usually pertaining to such positions, and by a board of directors of not less than seven members. All officers and directors shall be elected as provided for in the bylaws at an annual meeting and they shall hold office for one year and until their successors are elected, but, so that the terms of all directors shall not expire at the same time, the members, by bylaw or resolution, may provide that at one annual election that the term of half the number of directors, or if there be an uneven number, that the term of one less than the majority or the term of a majority of one, elected at said election, shall be for one year, and the term of the remaining directors elected at said election shall be for two years, and that all elections for directors, after the expiration of the aforesaid specific terms, shall be for two years. We, the said incorporators, have elected the following provisional officers to hold their respective positions until their successors are elected at the annual meeting in the year 19 President Vice President Secretary Secretary Board of Directors: 1. 2. 3. 4. 5. 6. 7. “Article
4.
The date of the annual meeting shall be stated in the bylaws. The bylaws shall be adopted by the members of the corporation and may be amended at any annual meeting of the members. “Article
5.
The yearly dues of the members of this corporation shall be not less than five dollars, payable at the time that application for membership is made and by or on the same date annually thereafter. No member who has once paid dues shall forfeit membership until subsequent dues are sixty days in arrears, but so long as any dues owing are unpaid, such member shall have no right to vote in any election or on any matter. “Article
6.
Any citizen of the county owning or operating a farm, or evidencing a primary interest in farming by reason of his position or occupation may become a member of the corporation by paying one year’s dues and complying with the articles of incorporation and bylaws. “Article
7.
This corporation shall endure until terminated by operation of law.”

Click to view

History.

42d-2: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 157, § 1.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(12/28/99). The signature lines in Article 3 of this statute have been altered under KRS

7.136

to restore the original format of the 1942 version of the statute. The 1952 amendment mistakenly omitted to include the phrase “Board of Directors,” and this omission, given the text of the statute was a manifest clerical or typographical error.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Kentucky Business Corporation Act, KRS ch. 271B.

247.251.
Existing bureaus not required to reincorporate.

Any county farm bureau heretofore incorporated, pursuant to KRS

247.250

, prior to June 19, 1952, shall not be required to reincorporate, but its articles of incorporation shall be construed as having been amended to incorporate therein the amendment to KRS

247.250

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 157, § 2, effective June 19, 1952.

247.260.
No recording fee — No salary for officers.

The articles of incorporation of a farm bureau shall be recorded by the county clerk without a fee of any kind.

No salary shall be paid to the president, vice president or any director.

History.

42d-6, 42d-7.

247.270.
Treasurer.

The treasurer of the farm bureau shall give bond, with security, the amount of which shall be fixed by the board of directors at double the amount of money likely to come into his hands. The bond shall be filed with the county clerk and be recorded without fee. In no case shall the bond of the treasurer be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

The treasurer shall receive all funds belonging to the farm bureau and all appropriations made by the fiscal court. He shall pay out the funds of the farm bureau only on bills allowed by the board of directors or by the executive committee of the board of directors. The allowance shall be certified to by the president or secretary.

No treasurer shall in any manner convert the funds or property of a farm bureau to his own use or pay out or dispose of the same in any manner different than as directed by KRS

247.240

to

247.320

.

History.

42d-9, 42d-13, 42d-15.

247.280.
President and treasurer to file report.

The outgoing president and treasurer of a farm bureau shall by the date of the annual meeting file with the county clerk full and detailed sworn reports of all receipts and expenditures of the corporation, showing from whom the sums were received and to whom they were paid, and for what purposes they were received or paid. A duplicate of the reports shall be laid before the members at the annual meeting.

History.

42d-10: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 157, § 3; 1956, ch. 51, § 1.

247.290.
Bureaus that may receive county aid. [Repealed.]

247.300.
Fiscal court to appropriate money for bureau, when — Limit on amount — Additional appropriation for agricultural extension work.

Whenever the secretary and the treasurer of a county farm bureau organized under KRS

247.240

to

247.370

have certified to the fiscal court of the county that the bureau has not less than one hundred (100) members who own or operate farms in the county and has a fund of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) in the possession of its treasurer, which fund was obtained from among its members by membership dues or otherwise, the fiscal court shall, subject to subsection (2), appropriate for county cooperative extension work out of the general fund of the county to aid in carrying on extension work in that county in agriculture and home economics and in connection with the University of Kentucky, a sum equal to twice the amount of the said fund in the hands of the bureau.

The total sum appropriated under this section by the fiscal court shall not, in any year, exceed:

Five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any county having an assessed property valuation of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) or more;

Four thousand dollars ($4,000) in any county having an assessed property valuation of more than fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) but less than twenty million dollars ($20,000,000);

Three thousand dollars ($3,000) in any county having an assessed property valuation of between ten ($10,000,000) and fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000);

Two thousand dollars ($2,000) in any county having an assessed property valuation of between five ($5,000,000) and ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or

One thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) in any county having an assessed property valuation of not more than five million dollars ($5,000,000).

Nothing in this section shall prevent or prohibit a fiscal court from appropriating additional funds in support of agricultural extension work under provisions of KRS

247.080

and appropriations made under either section shall be expended as provided for in KRS

247.310

.

History.

42d-11: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 51, § 3.

247.310.
Expenditure of county appropriations.

All appropriations from fiscal courts shall be used in the payment of salaries and expenses of duly appointed extension service employees of the College of Agriculture and Home Economics of the University of Kentucky, serving in the county making the appropriation, or to pay for supplies or equipment for these employees.

History.

42d-11: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 51, § 4.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A fiscal court has no statutory authority to appropriate money out of its annual funds toward the purchase of land to be used as a county fairground.

OAG 63-643

.

247.320.
Expenditure of dues.

The farm bureau may use part or all of the sums annually received as dues from its members in payment of dues or assessments levied or assessed against it by the State Federation of Farm Bureaus or the American Farm Bureau Federation or in any manner designed to promote the best interests of its members.

History.

42d-5: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 51, § 5.

247.330.
State federation of farm bureaus.

A state federation of county farm bureaus may be formed by a majority of the county farm bureaus in existence at the time of the formation of said federation, which have been organized pursuant to KRS

247.240

and

247.250

, but said majority shall consist of no less than ten (10) such county farm bureaus.

The state federation of farm bureaus shall have for its purpose the advancement and improvement of agricultural and allied interests of the farms of this state and may cooperate with the department, the College of Agriculture of the University of Kentucky, and the United States Department of Agriculture.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not affect any existing state federation formed pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 76 of the Acts of 1920 of the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

42d-16: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 157, § 4.

247.340.
Incorporation, powers, directors of federation — Existing federation.

The said federation of farm bureaus organized pursuant to KRS

247.330

shall be a body corporate upon the filing with the county clerk of the county in which the principal office of said federation is located, articles of incorporation signed by the requisite number of authorized representatives of said county farm bureaus, and upon the filing of a copy of said articles of incorporation certified to by said county clerk, in the office of the Secretary of State of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

Said articles of incorporation shall state:

The names of the county farm bureaus organizing said state federation;

The corporate name of said state federation;

The location of the principal office;

The nature of its business and its general powers, and may set out any other provision, which the incorporators may deem desirable and which are not in conflict with the law.

The incorporators signing the articles of incorporation shall constitute the first board of directors until the first annual election date to be fixed by the bylaws of the corporation.

Any state federation of county farm bureaus heretofore organized pursuant to the provisions of KRS

247.330

, or, Chapter 76 of the Acts of 1920 of the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, and having heretofore filed its articles of incorporation as provided in this section, shall not be required to reincorporate, but may continue its corporate existence as if done pursuant hereto, and said corporation or any corporation organized pursuant to this section and KRS

247.330

, may amend its articles of incorporation by a majority vote of its voting delegates assembled in annual state convention.

History.

42d-17: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 157, § 5; 1978, ch. 384, § 382, effective June 17, 1978.

247.350.
Organization and function of state federation.

Any state federation organized pursuant to KRS

247.330

and

247.340

shall have the following organization and function in the following manner:

The said federation shall hold an annual meeting at a date to be fixed by its bylaws, which annual meeting may be referred to as the “annual convention” of said federation;

Each county farm bureau shall be entitled to no less than two (2) voting delegates at the annual convention of the Kentucky Farm Bureau Federation. When a county farm bureau has received, during the fiscal year ending prior to said state convention, one hundred fifty (150) paid-in regular memberships, as defined in the bylaws of the federation, each additional one hundred (100) paid-in regular memberships or major portion thereof shall entitle the county farm bureau to an additional voting delegate. No voting delegate shall vote by proxy, unless the proxy is in writing in a form approved by the board of directors of the state federation;

The governing body of said state federation shall consist of a board of directors of not less than seven (7) members. The distribution of said directors shall be by state federation districts, and set forth in the bylaws of the corporation. Each director shall be elected for a term of two (2) years, shall be a resident of the district from which he is elected, must be actively engaged in farming, or evidencing a primary interest therein by reason of his position or occupation, and shall be nominated by the voting delegates of said district and elected by a majority vote of the voting delegates voting either in person or by proxy at said election;

Said state federation, by bylaws, shall have authority to provide for additional directors representing cooperating agricultural agencies;

The officers of said federation shall consist of a president, a first vice president, and a second vice president, who shall be elected by majority vote cast by the voting delegates at the annual convention, and there shall be an executive officer of the corporation, who shall be elected by the board of directors, and who shall be an ex officio member of the board, without power to vote; and

The board of directors shall select from its membership an executive committee composed of three (3) persons, and said committee shall have general charge of the management of the business of the federation in the interim between meetings of the board of directors and shall possess such powers, duties and responsibilities as may be provided in the bylaws of the federation or by resolution of the board of directors.

History.

42d-18: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 157, § 6; 1978, ch. 146, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 165, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

247.360.
Directors may provide for officers’ bonds and reports.

The board of directors, or the executive committee, if the board of directors is not in session, shall provide for the bonding of such officers and the making of such reports by officers as it deems necessary.

History.

42d-20.

247.370.
Eligibility for membership in federation — Powers of federation.

Every county farm bureau organized pursuant to KRS

247.250

shall be eligible to membership in any said state federation, but after its admission to membership, said federation shall have power to suspend its membership or expel it for failure to comply with any bylaws or reasonable rule or regulation of the federation.

Any said state federation shall have authority to:

Adopt, amend and repeal bylaws and amendments thereto by two-thirds (2/3) vote of the voting delegates voting at an annual convention;

Assess annual membership dues against each county farm bureau, and base the amount thereof on the number of paid-in memberships in each county farm bureau;

Acquire, own and hold property, pursuant to action of its board of directors, or by its executive committee upon authorization or approval of its board of directors;

Borrow money and mortgage or pledge its property or assets by action of its board of directors, or, by its executive committee, upon authorization or approval of its board of directors;

Accept gifts, devises and bequests, appropriate and expend its funds, pursuant to action of its board of directors, or its executive committee, upon authorization or approval by its board of directors, for the advancement of agriculture and allied interests and for any purposes deemed advisable to carry on its activities; and

Do anything necessary to carry out the purpose for which it is organized.

History.

42d-19: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 157, § 7; 1978, ch. 146, § 2, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section would prevail over a conflicting bylaw of the Kentucky Farm Bureau Federation as to the procedure to be followed in amending the bylaws of the Kentucky Farm Bureau Federation.

OAG 76-713

.